Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB35.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1302.2-B. School Safety Blueprint Requirement.(a) Requirement.--Each school entity shall provide the Pennsylvania State Police or municipal police department that has jurisdiction over the school entity with current blueprints for each building of the school entity and provide updated blueprints as changes are made to the building layout.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 12345678910111213141516171819 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School entity." A public school district, joint school district, charter school, cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0035PN0014 - 2 - 123456